West Virginia, session 2026, HB4327.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. AUTHORIZATION FOR DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE TO PROMULGATE LEGISLATIVE RULES. §64-10-1. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (small arms hunting, 58 CSR 14), is authorized.